de: Konnektivitätstechnologie: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Mobilfunk; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infrarot; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Radio; Satellit; USB; Wi-Fi; Kabelgebunden; Kabellos; WLAN-Dongle; Sonstiges
nl: Connectiviteitstechnologie: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Mobiel; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infrarood; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Radio; Satelliet; USB; Wifi; Bedraad; Draadloos; Draadloze dongel; Andere
th: เทคโนโลยีการเชื่อมต่อ: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; บลูทูธ; เครือข่ายมือถือ; DECT; DVI; อีเทอร์เน็ต; GPS; HDMI; อินฟราเรด; LTE; Miracast; NFC; วิทยุ; ระบบจานดาวเทียม; USB; Wi-Fi; แบบมีสาย; แบบไร้สาย; ดองเกิลไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tecnologia de conectividade: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Celular; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infravermelho; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Rádio; Satélite; USB; Wi-Fi; Com fio; Sem fio; Dongle sem fio; Outro
hu: Csatlakozási technológia: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Mobil; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infravörös; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Rádió; Műhold; USB; Wi-Fi; Vezetékes; Vezeték nélküli; Vezeték nélküli hardverkulcs; Egyéb
el: Τεχνολογία συνδεσιμότητας: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Κυψελοειδής; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Υπέρυθρες; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Ραδιοσύνδεση; Δορυφορική; USB; Wi-Fi; Ενσύρματη; Χωρίς μπανέλα; Ασύρματο κλειδί προστασίας; Άλλο
ja: 接続技術: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; セルラー; DECT; DVI; イーサネット; GPS; HDMI; 赤外線; LTE; Miracast; NFC; 無線機; サテライト; USB; Wi-Fi; 有線; 無線; 無線ドングル; その他
es: Tecnología de conectividad: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Celular; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infrarrojo; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Radio; Satélite; USB; Wi-Fi; Cableado; Inalámbrico; Llave inalámbrica; Otros
zh-CN: 连接技术: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; 蓝牙; 蜂窝状; DECT; DVI; 以太网; GPS; HDMI; 红外; LTE; 无线显示; NFC; 收音机; 卫星; USB; Wi-Fi; 有线; 无线; 无线适配器; 其他
en: Connectivity technology: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Cellular; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infrared; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Radio; Satellite; USB; Wi-Fi; Wired; Wireless; Wireless dongle; Other
tr: Bağlantı Teknolojisi: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Hücresel; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Kızılötesi; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Radyo; Uydu; USB; Wi-Fi; Kablolu; Kablosuz; Kablosuz donanım kilidi; Diğer
bg-BG: Технология за свързване: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Мобилна; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Инфрачервен; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Радио; Сателит; USB; Wi-Fi; С кабел; Безжична; Безжичен донгъл; Други
ru: Технология подключения: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Сотовое; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Инфракрасный; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Радио; Спутниковое; USB; Wi-Fi; Проводное; Беспроводное; Беспроводной ключ; Другое
zh-TW: 連接技術: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; 藍牙; 蜂窩網路; DECT; DVI; 乙太網路; GPS; HDMI; 紅外線; LTE; 米拉卡斯特; NFC; 收音機; 衛星; USB; Wi-Fi; 有線; 無線; 無線適配器; 其他
it: Tecnologia di connettività: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Cellulare; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infrarossi; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Radio; Satellitare; USB; Wi-Fi; Cablata; Senza fili; Chiavetta wireless; Altro
vi: Công nghệ kết nối: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Di động; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Hồng ngoại; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Radio; Vệ tinh; USB; Wi-Fi; Có kết nối dây; Không dây; Dongle không dây; Khác
nb: Tilkoblingsteknologi: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Celle; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infrarød; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Radio; Satellitt; USB; Wi-Fi; Kablet; Trådløs; Trådløs dongel; Annen
hr-HR: Tehnologija povezivanja: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Mobilna mreža; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infracrveno; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Radio; Satelit; USB; Wi-Fi; Žičana; Bežična; Bežični ključ; Ostalo
sk-SK: Technológia pripojenia: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Bunkový; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infračervený; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Rádio; Satelit; USB; Wi-Fi; Drôtový; Bez kostice; Bezdrôtový dongle; Iné
da: Forbindelsesteknologi: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Cellulær; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infrarød; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Radio; Satellit; USB; Wi-Fi; Kablet; Trådløs; Trådløs dongle; Andet
sl-SI: Tehnologija povezljivosti: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Mobilna; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infrardeča; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Radio; Satelit; USB; Wi-Fi; Žična; Brezžično; Brezžični ključek; Drugo
cs: Technologie připojení: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Mobilní; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infračervená; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Rádio; Satelit; USB; Wi-Fi; Kabelové; Bezdrátové; Bezdrátový dongle; Jiné
ro-RO: Tehnologie de conectivitate: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Celular; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infraroșu; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Radio; Satelit; USB; Wi-Fi; Cablată; Fără sârmă; Dongle wireless; Altele
sv: Anslutningsteknik: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Cellulär; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infraröd; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Radio; Satellit; USB; Wi-Fi; Trådbunden; Trådlös; Trådlös dongel; Annat
fr: Technologie de connectivité: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Cellulaire; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infrarouge; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Radio; Satellite; USB; Wi-Fi; Filaire; Sans fil; Clé sans fil; Autre
pl: Technologia łączności: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Komórkowy; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Podczerwień; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Radio; Satelita; USB; Wi-Fi; Przewodowy; Bezprzewodowy; Klucz bezprzewodowy; Pozostałe
pt-PT: Tecnologia de conectividade: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Celular; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infravermelho; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Rádio; Satélite; USB; Wi-Fi; Com fios; Sem fios; Dongle sem fios; Outro
ko: 연결 기술: ANT; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; 셀룰러; DECT; DVI; 이더넷; GPS; HDMI; 적외선; LTE; Miracast; NFC; 라디오; 위성; USB; Wi-Fi; 유선; 무선; 무선 동글; 기타
fi: Liitettävyystekniikka: ANT+; ANT+; AirPlay; Bluetooth; Solu; DECT; DVI; Ethernet; GPS; HDMI; Infrapuna; LTE; Miracast; NFC; Radio; Satelliitti; USB; Wi-Fi; Langallinen; Langattomat; Langaton dongle; Muu
lt-LT: Ryšio technologija: ANT; ANT+; „AirPlay“; „Bluetooth“; Korinė; DECT; DVI; Eterneto; GPS; HDMI; Infraraudonųjų spindulių; LTE; „Miracast“; NFC; Radijo; Palydovinė; USB; Wi-Fi; Laidinė; Belaidė; Belaidis raktas; Kita